Hawaii statutes.
[§193-33] Personnel laws; applicability.
The provisions of chapters 76 to 80, and 88, except provisions of state law
relating to the application of the Social Security Act of the United States to
the extent that the Act shall be applicable under the federal law establishing
the youth programs, shall not apply to persons employed under this part. [L
2001, c 268, pt of §1]

Note

Chapters 77, 79, and 80 referred to in text are repealed.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next